Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0402

Becoming a member.

After formation of a limited cooperative association, a person becomes a member:

(1) As provided in the organic rules;

(2) As the result of a conversion or merger effective under RCW 23.100.1301 through 23.100.1320; or

(3) With the affirmative vote or consent of all the members.

[ 2019 c 37 s 402.]